New Jersey, session 222, S2778.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 3 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-3) is amended to read as follows: 3.    As used in sections 1 through 27 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 through C.58:11B-27), sections 23 through 27 of P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-10.1, C.58:11B-20.1, C.58:11B-21.1, C.58:11B-22.1, and C.58:11B-22.2), and sections 22 and 34 through 38 of P.L.2016, c.56 (C.58:11B-10.3 through C.58:11B-10.5, C.58:11B-20.2, C.58:11B-22.3, and C.58:11B-22.4): "Aviation project" means a project to develop or improve county or municipal airport facilities, or airport facilities owned or operated by a regional transportation authority that is not a bi-state authority, and related infrastructure or capital equipment, including, but not limited to, any design, planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, relocation, installation, removal, repair, or rehabilitation project that facilitates, increases the efficiency of, or improves the capacity for inter-modal trade for commercial and industrial facilities that are part of airport facilities. "Aviation project" includes, but is not limited to, any project to develop or improve terminal facilities designed for public use and for the transportation of persons or property, such as airports, runways, berms, basins, storage places, sheds, warehouses, and related infrastructure; "Bonds" means bonds issued by the trust pursuant to P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.) or P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-10.1 et al.); "Combined sewer overflow" means the discharge of untreated or partially treated stormwater runoff and wastewater from a combined sewer system into a body of water; "Combined sewer system" means a sewer system designed to carry sanitary wastewater at all times, which is also designed to collect and transport stormwater runoff from streets and other sources, thereby serving a combined purpose; "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of the Department of Environmental Protection; "Cost" means the cost of all labor, materials, machinery and equipment, lands, property, rights and easements, financing charges, interest on bonds, notes or other obligations, plans and specifications, surveys or estimates of costs and revenues, engineering and legal services, and all other expenses necessary or incident to all or part of an environmental infrastructure project; "Department" means the Department of Environmental Protection; "Environmental infrastructure project" means the acquisition, construction, improvement, repair or reconstruction of all or part of any structure, facility or equipment, or real or personal property necessary for or ancillary to any: (1) wastewater treatment system project, including any stormwater management or combined sewer overflow abatement projects; or (2) water supply project, as authorized pursuant to P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.) or P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-10.1 et al.), including any water resources project, as authorized pursuant to P.L.2003, c.162; "Federal infrastructure bank program" means the United States Department of Transportation State Infrastructure Bank Program provided for in section 350 of Pub.L.104-59 and Pub.L.102-240 as amended or superseded; "Local government unit" means (1) a State authority, county, municipality, municipal, county or regional sewerage or utility authority, municipal sewerage district, joint meeting, improvement authority, the Palisades Interstate Park Commission established pursuant to P.L.1980, c.104 (C.32:14-1.1 et seq.), or any other political subdivision of the State authorized to construct, operate, and maintain wastewater treatment systems; (2) a State authority, district water supply commission, county, municipality, municipal, county or regional utilities authority, municipal water district, joint meeting, the Palisades Interstate Park Commission established pursuant to P.L.1980, c.104 (C.32:14-1.1 et seq.), or any other political subdivision of the State authorized pursuant to law to operate or maintain a public water supply system or to construct, rehabilitate, operate, or maintain water supply facilities or otherwise provide water for human consumption; (3) a county, municipality, municipal, county or regional transportation authority, the Palisades Interstate Park Commission established pursuant to P.L.1980, c.104 (C.32:14-1.1 et seq.), or any other political subdivision of the State authorized to construct, operate, or maintain public highways or transportation projects; (4) a county, municipality, or other political subdivision or instrumentality of the State, or a municipal, county, or State authority that is not a bi-state authority, authorized to construct, operate, or maintain ports or marine projects; (5) a county, municipality, municipal or regional transportation authority, or other political subdivision or instrumentality of the State authorized to construct, operate, or maintain airports or aviation projects; or (6) a local government unit as defined in section 2 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-20.4) authorized to receive funds pursuant to the "Safeguarding Tomorrow Through Ongoing Risk Mitigation (STORM) Act," Pub.L. 116-284 (42 U.S.C. s.5135), as amended or supplemented, and P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-20.3 et al.); "Marine project" means a project to develop or improve public port or terminal facilities, and related infrastructure or capital equipment, including, but not limited to, any design, planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, relocation, installation, removal, repair, or rehabilitation project that facilitates, increases the efficiency of, or improves the capacity for inter-modal trade and cargo movement for commercial or industrial facilities that are part of port or terminal facilities.  "Marine project" includes, but is not limited to, dredging, soil hardening, and paving of the port facilities, and ferry terminal facilities designed for public use and the transportation of persons or property such as water craft, docks, wharves, piers, slips, storage places, sheds, warehouses, and related infrastructure.  "Marine project" shall not include any project that relates to or supports recreational or commercial boating activities; "New Jersey Environmental Infrastructure Financing Program" means the financing program to fund environmental infrastructure projects; "New Jersey Transportation Infrastructure Financing Program" means the financing program to fund transportation projects, aviation projects, and marine projects; "Notes" means notes issued by the trust pursuant to P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.), P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-10.1 et al.), or sections 22 and 34 through 38 of P.L.2016, c.56 (C.58:11B-10.3 through C.58:11B-10.5, C.58:11B-20.2, C.58:11B-22.3, and C.58:11B-22.4); "Onsite wastewater treatment and disposal system" means an onsite system designed to treat and dispose of domestic sewage; "Other assistance" means forms of financial assistance, in addition to loans, authorized by the New Jersey Infrastructure Bank from the State Transportation Infrastructure Bank Fund, the wastewater treatment system general loan fund, the water supply facilities general loan fund, or the Community Hazard Assistance Mitigation Program Revolving Loan Fund established pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-10.6), including, but not limited to, use of funds to: provide credit enhancements, serve as a capital reserve for bond or other debt instrument financing, subsidize interest rates, ensure the issuance of letters of credit and credit instruments, finance purchase and lease agreements with respect to transit projects, and provide bond or other debt financing instrument security; "Planning, design, and construction loan" means a short-term or temporary loan for eligible costs incurred in project planning, engineering design, or construction issued before or during the planning stage of a project; "Project" means the acquisition, construction, improvement, repair or reconstruction of all or part of any structure, facility, or equipment, or real or personal property necessary for or ancillary to any: (1) wastewater treatment system project, including any stormwater management or combined sewer overflow abatement projects; (2) water supply project, as authorized pursuant to P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.) or P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-10.1 et al.), including any water resources project, as authorized pursuant to P.L.2003, c.162; or (3) transportation project, aviation project, or marine project authorized pursuant to sections 22 and 34 through 38 of P.L.2016, c.56 (C.58:11B-10.3 through C.58:11B-10.5, C.58:11B-20.2, C.58:11B-22.3, and C.58:11B-22.4); "Public highway" means public roads, streets, expressways, freeways, parkways, motorways and boulevards, including bridges, tunnels, overpasses, underpasses, interchanges, express bus roadways, bus pullouts and turnarounds, park-ride facilities, traffic circles, grade separations, traffic control devices, the elimination or improvement of crossings of railroads and highways, whether at-grade or not at-grade, bicycle and pedestrian pathways and pedestrian and bicycle bridges, and any property, rights of way, easements and interests therein needed for the construction, improvement, and maintenance of highways; "Public water utility" means any investor-owned water company or small water company; "Small water company" means any company, purveyor, or entity, other than a governmental agency, that provides water for human consumption and which regularly serves less than 1,000 customer connections, including nonprofit, noncommunity water systems owned or operated by a nonprofit group or organization; "Stormwater management system" means any equipment, plants, structures, machinery, apparatus, management practices, or land, or any combination thereof, acquired, used, constructed, implemented, or operated to prevent nonpoint source pollution, abate improper cross-connections and interconnections between stormwater and sewer systems, minimize stormwater runoff, reduce soil erosion, or induce groundwater recharge, or any combination thereof; "Transportation project" means a capital project for public highways, approach roadways, and other necessary land-side improvements, ramps, signal systems, roadbeds, transit lanes or rights of way, related transmission and distribution lines, pedestrian walkways and bridges connecting to passenger stations and servicing facilities, bridges, and grade crossings; "Trust" means the New Jersey Infrastructure Bank created pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-4); "Wastewater" means residential, commercial, industrial, or agricultural liquid waste, sewage, septage, stormwater runoff, or any combination thereof, or other liquid residue discharged or collected into a sewer system or stormwater management system, or any combination thereof; "Wastewater treatment system" means any equipment, plants, structures, machinery, apparatus, or land, or any combination thereof, acquired, used, constructed or operated by, or on behalf of, a local government unit for the storage, collection, reduction, recycling, reclamation, disposal, separation, or other treatment of wastewater or sewage sludge, or for the collection or treatment, or both, of stormwater runoff and wastewater, or for the final disposal of residues resulting from the treatment of wastewater, including, but not limited to, pumping and ventilating stations, treatment plants and works, connections, outfall sewers, interceptors, trunk lines, stormwater management systems, and other personal property and appurtenances necessary for their use or operation; "wastewater treatment system" shall include a stormwater management system or a combined sewer system; "Wastewater treatment system project" means any work relating to the acquisition, construction, improvement, repair or reconstruction of all or part of any structure, facility or equipment, or real or personal property necessary for or ancillary to any wastewater treatment system that meets the requirements set forth in sections 20, 21, and 22 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-20, C.58:11B-21, and C.58:11B-22); or any work relating to any of the stormwater management or combined sewer overflow abatement projects identified in the stormwater management and combined sewer overflow abatement project priority list adopted by the commissioner pursuant to section 28 of P.L.1989, c.181; or any work relating to the purposes set forth in section 6 of P.L.2003, c.162; or any work relating to any other project eligible for financing under the "Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972" (33 U.S.C. s.1251 et seq.), or any amendatory or supplementary acts thereto; "Water resources project" means any work related to transferring water between public water systems during a state of water emergency, to avert a drought emergency in all or any part of the State, to plan, design or construct interconnections of existing water supplies, or to extend water supplies to areas with contaminated ground water supplies; "Water supply facilities" means and refers to the real property and the plants, structures, interconnections between existing water supply facilities, machinery and equipment and other property, real, personal and mixed, acquired, constructed or operated, or to be acquired, constructed or operated, in whole or in part, by or on behalf of a public water utility, or by or on behalf of the State or a local government unit, for the purpose of augmenting the natural water resources of the State and making available an increased supply of water for all uses, or of conserving existing water resources, and any and all appurtenances necessary, useful or convenient for the collecting, impounding, storing, improving, treating, filtering, conserving or transmitting of water, and for the preservation and protection of these resources and facilities, whether in public or private ownership, and providing for the conservation and development of future water supply resources, and facilitating incidental recreational uses thereof; "Water supply project" means any work relating to the acquisition, construction, improvement, repair or reconstruction of all or part of any structure, facility or equipment, or real or personal property necessary for or ancillary to water supply facilities that meets the requirements set forth in sections 24, 25, and 26 of P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-20.1, C.58:11B-21.1, and C.58:11B-22.1); or any work relating to the purposes set forth in section 4 of P.L.1981, c.261; or any work relating to the purposes set forth in section 6 of P.L.2003, c.162; or any work relating to any other project eligible for funding pursuant to the federal "Safe Drinking Water Act Amendments of 1996," Pub.L.104-182, and any amendatory and supplementary acts thereto. (cf:  P.L.2025, c.14, s.1) 2.    Section 2 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-20.4) is amended to read as follows: 2.    As used in sections 1 through 8 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-20.3 et al.): "Bank" means the New Jersey Infrastructure Bank, created pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-4). "Bonds" mean the bonds issued, or authorized to be issued, by the bank pursuant to sections 1 through 8 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-20.3 et al.) and in compliance with the bank's authority pursuant to, and subject to the same conditions as provided in, P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.) or P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-10.1 et al.), as applicable. "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Environmental Protection. "Community Hazard Assistance Mitigation Program" means the program established by the bank pursuant to sections 1 through 8 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-20.3 et al.). "Fund" means the Community Hazard Assistance Mitigation Program Revolving Loan Fund established pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-10.6). "Hazard mitigation and resilience project" means a hazard mitigation and resilience project undertaken by the State, a local government unit, or a nonprofit organization in accordance with the provisions of the STORM Act and a State or local hazard mitigation plan. "Loan origination fee" means the fee charged by the bank in connection with services provided to a sponsor of a hazard mitigation and resilience project pursuant to the sponsor's participation in the Community Hazard Assistance Mitigation Program. A project sponsor may finance any portion of the loan origination fee through the bank by a hazard mitigation and resilience project assistance loan to pay a portion of the costs incurred by the bank in the implementation of the Community Hazard Assistance Mitigation Program. "Local government unit" means any county or municipality, or any agency, instrumentality, authority, or corporation of any county or municipality, the Palisades Interstate Park Commission established pursuant to P.L.1980, c.104 (C.32:14-1.1 et seq.), or any other entity eligible to receive federal funds pursuant to the STORM Act. "Nonprofit organization" means a private nonprofit organization that is exempt from federal taxation pursuant to section 501 (c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. s.501 (c)(3). "Other assistance" means the same as the same as the term is defined in section 3 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-3). "State Office of Emergency Management" means the Office of Emergency Management in the Division of State Police in the Department of Law and Public Safety. "STORM Act" means the "Safeguarding Tomorrow through Ongoing Risk Mitigation Act," Pub. L. 116-284, as amended or superseded, and any rules, regulations, or guidance adopted pursuant thereto by the Federal Emergency Management Agency. (cf:  P.L.2025, c.14, s.7) 3.  (New section). a.  As used in this section: "Commission" means the Palisades Interstate Park Commission established pursuant to P.L.1980, c.104 (C.32:14-1.1 et seq.). "Department" means the Department of Environmental Protection. "Hazard mitigation and resilience project" means the same as the term is defined in section 2 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-20.4). "New Jersey Infrastructure Bank" or "I-Bank" means the New Jersey Infrastructure Bank created pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-4). "Transportation project" means the same as the term is defined in section 3 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-3). "Wastewater treatment system project" means the same as the term is defined in section 3 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-3). "Water supply project" means the same as the term is defined in section 3 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-3). b.  To the extent consistent with applicable federal law, and notwithstanding any provision of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.),  P.L.2016, c.56, (C.58:11B-10.3 et al.), or P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-20.3 et al.) to the contrary, a hazard mitigation and resilience project, transportation project, wastewater treatment system project, or water supply project undertaken by the commission in New Jersey shall be considered a local government project for the purposes of eligibility for funding pursuant to P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.), P.L.2016, c.56, (C.58:11B-10.3 et al.), and P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-20.3 et al.).  Requests by the commission for funding shall be submitted to the I-Bank or the department, as appropriate, and reviewed in the same manner as similar requests from other local government units. c.     The passage of a legislative appropriations bill pursuant to P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.), P.L.2016, c.56, (C.58:11B-10.3 et al.), or P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-20.3 et al.), which contains an appropriation for a project sponsored by the commission, shall be deemed legislative authority for that project for the purposes of R.S.32:17-8. 4. This act shall take effect immediately.